Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 9 Fairgrounds, Airports, Parks, Pleasure Grounds and RecreationalSystems

Cross references. —

For duty of county to provide and maintain necessary county buildings, see §

18-2-103

.

As to joint city and county buildings, see §

18-2-104

.

For authority of fair board of county to issue certificates of indebtedness, see §

18-4-104

.

For constitutional provision relative to the construction, maintenance and improvement of public airports, aircraft landing strips and related facilities, see art. 16, § 11, Wyo. Const.

For power and duty of Wyoming aeronautics commission to enforce proper maintenance of airports of cities, counties and towns, see §

10-3-201

.

As to municipal and county airports generally, see §

10-5-101

et seq.

As to payment of gasoline taxes derived from use of airfields to county for support of airfields, see §

39-17-111

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 532 to 559, 586 to 592; 71 Am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation § 1 et seq.

Liability to one struck by golf ball, 53 ALR4th 282.

Liability for injury incurred in operation of power golf cart, 66 ALR4th 622.

20 C.J.S. Counties §§ 165 to 172.